Washington statutes.
RCW 19.184.020

Warranty—Implied.

A manufacturer who sells a wheelchair to a consumer, either directly or through a wheelchair dealer, shall furnish the consumer with an express warranty for the wheelchair. The duration of the express warranty must be for at least one year after the first delivery of the wheelchair to the consumer. If the manufacturer fails to furnish an express warranty as required under this section, the wheelchair is covered by an implied warranty as if the manufacturer had furnished an express warranty to the consumer as required under this section.

[ 1995 c 14 s 2; 1994 c 104 s 2.]